Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
During the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  all lottery revenues available to
benefit the public purposes specified in Article  XV, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution,
that are in  excess of distributions or allocations required by law shall be maintained in the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund.
SECTION 2. All moneys in the Administrative Services Economic  Development Fund as
of July 1, 2019, and thereafter are reserved  to meet the commitments of sections 1 to 12a
of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019,
from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund, to  the Oregon Business De-
velopment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 8,773,826
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 57,965,174
(3) Infrastructure ........................... $ 5,351,472
(4) Infrastructure - Tide
Gates and Culverts Program .... $ 6,000,000
(5) Oregon Film and Video Office .. $ 1,253,432
(6) Arts and Cultural Trust ........... $ 2,125,000
SECTION 4. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Admin-
istrative Services  Economic Development Fund, to the Department of Education, for the
State School Fund, the amount of $530,146,857.
SECTION 5. There is transferred to the Lottery  Bond Fund for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2019, out of the Oregon  Education Fund, 100 percent of the declared earnings on the
Education Stability Fund that are transferred to  the Oregon Education Fund during the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, to be used by the Department of Education for  the purposes
of maintaining cash flow and paying, when due, the principal, interest and  premium, if any,
on outstanding education lottery bonds.
SECTION 6. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund,  to the office of the Governor, the amount
of $3,932,736 for expenses of the Regional Solutions Program.
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall establish a
process for  allocating available moneys in the Administrative Services Economic Develop-
ment Fund on a quarterly basis to fulfill the biennial  allocations made by sections 1 to 12a
of this 2019 Act. The department shall set the quarterly allocations.
(2) If, in any quarter, the moneys  transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development Fund are insufficient to  pay for the quarterly
allocations made by sections 1 to 12a of this  2019 Act or any other 2019 Act, prior to making
any other allocations  pursuant to sections 1 to 12a of this 2019 Act, the department shall
satisfy lottery  bond debt service obligations in the amount of $263,661,510 for outstanding
lottery bonds.
(3) After the lottery bond debt service obligations described  in subsection (2) of this
section are satisfied, if the remaining  moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to
the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund are insufficient to pay for the
quarterly allocations made by sections 1 to  12a of this 2019 Act, the department shall reduce
the quarterly allocations  not described in subsection (2) of this section proportionately in
amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 8. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to  the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, the amount of $263,661,510 for the purpose of paying, when due, the  principal, in-
terest and premium, if any, on outstanding lottery bonds, as described  in section 7 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.547 (1) for a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the amount
allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services for distribution to counties for economic  development
activities as provided by ORS 461.547 is $50,231,366.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.549 (2) for  a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the amount
allocated from the Administrative  Services Economic Development Fund to the Problem
Gambling Treatment Fund is $14,593,071.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in  ORS 565.447 for a
percentage-based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  the amount
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to  the County Fair
Account established in ORS 565.445 is $3,828,000.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the allocation described in section 2  (3),
chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2017 (Ballot Measure 99 (2016)), for a  percentage-based transfer of
moneys with an annual cap,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the amount allocated
from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to  the Outdoor School Edu-
cation Fund is $45,305,847.
SECTION 12a. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in  ORS 461.543 (4) for a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the amount
allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Sports Lot-
tery Account is $14,099,809.
SECTION 13. There are allocated  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to  the Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lot-
tery Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Veterans’ Services Program ..... $ 11,915,984
(2) County Veterans’ Service
Officers ..................................... $ 7,166,509
(3) National Service
Organizations............................ $ 477,354
(4) Veterans’ Affordable Housing ... $ 1,000,000
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 2
SECTION 13a. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, the amount of $250,000 for
the purpose of  implementing the provisions of section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled House Bill 2202).
SECTION 13b. There is  allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission, the amount of $555,000
for veterans’ specialty courts.
SECTION 13c. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the  Oregon Health Authority, the amount of $2,500,000 for
veterans’ behavioral health services.
SECTION 14. (1) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall establish a
process for allocating available moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund on a  quarterly basis
to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 13 to 13c of this 2019 Act.
(2) If the moneys transferred from the State  Lottery Fund to the Veterans’ Services
Fund are insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations  under subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall reduce  the quarterly allocations proportionately in amounts sufficient
to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding ORS 137.300, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, the
Department of Revenue shall distribute the moneys in  the Criminal Fine Account established
by ORS 137.300 as specified in sections 16 to 20 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 16. There are allocated to the Department of Public Safety Standards and
Training for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Criminal Fine Account, the fol-
lowing amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Criminal justice training
and standards operations .......... $ 31,999,031
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ... $ 279,495
SECTION 17.
There are allocated to the Department of Justice  for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2019, from  the Criminal Fine Account, the following amounts for the following
purposes:
(1) Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
Intervention Account ................ $ 9,824,565
(2) Creation and operation of a
statewide system of regional
assessment centers as
provided under ORS 418.746
to 418.796................................... $ 846,968
(3) Criminal Injuries
Compensation Account ............. $ 8,755,862
(4) Services to children eligible
for compensation under
ORS 147.390 and costs to
administer provision of
these services ........................... $ 716,912
SECTION 18.
There are allocated to the Department of Human Services for  the biennium
beginning July 1,  2019, from the Criminal Fine Account, the following amounts for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Domestic Violence Fund
established for ORS 409.300
for the purpose of
ORS 409.292 (1)(a) to (c) ............ $ 2,224,675
(2) Sexual Assault Victims Fund .... $ 533,332
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 3
SECTION 19. There are allocated  to the State Court Facilities and Security Account es-
tablished under ORS 1.178, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, from the Criminal Fine
Account, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) State court security
and emergency preparedness .... $ 3,784,490
(2) Distributions to county court
facilities security accounts ....... $ 2,931,528
SECTION 20. (1) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium be-
ginning July 1,  2019, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $42,884 for the purpose
of grants under ORS 430.345 for the establishment, operation  and maintenance of alcohol and
drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services provided through  a county.
(2) There is allocated to the Law Enforcement  Medical Liability Account established un-
der ORS  414.815, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Criminal Fine Account,
the amount of $1,300,000.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon State Police  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,
from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $351,572 for the purpose of enforcing the laws
relating to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(4) There is allocated to the Department  of Corrections for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, from the Criminal  Fine Account, the amount of $4,585,442 for the purpose of plan-
ning, operating and maintaining county juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities
and drug and alcohol programs. Notwithstanding ORS 137.300 (4), the grant to each county
shall be based  on the formula used to determine the distribution of moneys under the
Grant-in-Aid Program under ORS 423.530.
(5) There is allocated to the State  Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the  Criminal Fine Account, the amount of
$3,887,500.
(6) There is allocated to  the Intoxicated Driver Program Fund created under ORS 813.270,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of
$4,323,000.
(7) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium  beginning July
1, 2019, from the Criminal Fine Account, the  amount of $331,824 for the Emergency Medical
Services and Trauma Systems Program created under ORS 431A.085.
(8) There is allocated to the  Department of Revenue for the biennium beginning July 1,
2019, from the Criminal Fine  Account, the amount of $100,000 for administrative costs of the
department.
SECTION 21.
After distributing the amounts specified in sections 16 to 20  of this 2019
Act, the Department of  Revenue shall distribute funds remaining in the Criminal Fine Ac-
count to the General Fund.
SECTION 22. (1) There  is allocated to the State School Fund established under ORS
327.008, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the
amount of $103,764,900.
(2) There is allocated to the Oregon Health  Authority, for mental health treatment or for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early intervention and treatment
services, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from  the Oregon Marijuana Account, the
amount of $51,882,500.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon  Health Authority, for the health systems division,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the  amount
of $12,970,600 for purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention
and treatment services.
(4) There is allocated to  the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the  amount of
$38,911,800.
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 4
SECTION 23. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 26, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 5